South Dakota, session 2026, HB1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-10-2 be AMENDED:
13-10-2. The school board shall have the power to Except as otherwise provided
in section 2 of this Act, the board of a school district may employ any personnel deemed
necessary by the board for the functioning of the school and to may define the duties and
fix the compensation of each employee.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-10:
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 13-10-2, the board of a school district may not
employ a number of teachers in excess of the district's target teacher ratio factor, as
established in § 13-13-10.1.
The Department of Education shall, with moneys appropriated in the general
appropriation bill, pay the salary and benefits of each teacher employed by a school
district.
The South Dakota Board of Education Standards shall promulgate rules, pursuant
to chapter 1-26, establishing a salary schedule and benefits package for teachers. The
salary schedule must begin with the target teacher salary, established in § 13-13-10.1,
and must provide for increases to a teacher's salary that reflect:
(1) The demand for the teacher's area of certification;
(2) The highest degree and additional credit hours held by the teacher; and
(3) The teacher's years of experience.
The benefits package of each teacher employed by a school district must equal at
least twenty-nine percent of the teacher's salary.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 2 1239
Section 3. That § 13-13-10.1 be AMENDED:
13-13-10.1. The education funding terms and procedures referenced in this
chapter are defined as follows:
(1) "Nonresident students student," a student who are is in the care and custody of
the Department of Social Services, the Unified Judicial System, the Department of
Corrections, or other state agencies and are attending a public school may be
included in the fall enrollment of the receiving district when enrolled in the receiving
district;
(2) "Fall enrollment," is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the number of kindergarten through twelfth grade students
enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the current school year;
(b) Subtract the number of students for whom the district receives tuition
except for:
(i) Nonresident students who are in the care and custody of a state
agency and are attending a public school district; and
(ii) Students who are being provided an education pursuant to § 13-28-
11; and
(c) Add the number of students for whom the district pays tuition.
When computing state aid to education for a school district pursuant to § 13-13-73, the
secretary of the Department of Education shall use the school district's fall
enrollment;
(3) "Target teacher ratio factor," is:
(a) For school districts with a fall enrollment of two hundred or less, the target
teacher ratio factor is 12;
(b) For districts with a fall enrollment of greater than two hundred, but less
than six hundred, the target teacher ratio factor is calculated as follows:
(i) Multiplying the fall enrollment by .00750; and
(ii) Adding 10.50 to the resulting product; and
(c) For districts with a fall enrollment of six hundred or greater, the target
teacher ratio factor is 15.
The fall enrollment used for the determination of the target teacher ratio for a school
district may not include any students residing in a residential treatment facility
when the education program is operated by the school district;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 3 1239
(4) "English learner (EL) adjustment," is calculated by multiplying 0.25 times the
number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students who, in the prior school
year, scored below level four on the state-administered language proficiency
assessment as required in the state's consolidated state application pursuant to
§ 1111(b)(2)(G) of the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015;
(5) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment or three percent, whichever is less;
(6) "Target teacher salary," for the school fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, is
$62,821.19. Each school fiscal year thereafter, the target teacher salary is the
previous fiscal year's target teacher salary increased by the index factor;
(7) "Target teacher benefits," is the target teacher salary multiplied by twenty-nine
percent;
(8) "Target teacher compensation," is the sum of the target teacher salary and the
target teacher benefits;
(9) "Overhead rate," is thirty-eight and seventy-eight-hundredths percent. Beginning
in school fiscal year 2018, the overhead rate must be adjusted to take into account
the sum of the amounts that districts exceed the other revenue base amount;
(10) "Local need," is calculated as follows:
(a) Divide the fall enrollment by the target teacher ratio factor;
(b) If applicable, divide the English Learner adjustment pursuant to subdivision
(4) by the target teacher ratio factor;
(c) Add the results of subsections (a) and (b);
(d) Multiply the result of subsection (c) by the target teacher compensation;
(e) Multiply the product of subsection (d) by the overhead rate;
(f) Add the products of subsections (d) and (e) and subdivision (20);
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for costs related to technology in schools and statewide student
assessments;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for sparse school district benefits, calculated pursuant to §§ 13-13-
78 and 13-13-79; and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 4 1239
(i) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amounts set
aside for career and technical education calculated pursuant to §§ 13-13-
81 and 13-13-82;
(11) "Alternative per student need," is calculated as follows:
(a) Add the total need for each school district for school fiscal year 2016,
including the small school adjustment and the English learner adjustment,
to the lesser of the amount of funds apportioned to each school district in
the year preceding the most recently completed school fiscal year or school
fiscal year 2015 pursuant to §§ 10-33-24, 10-35-21, 10-36-10, 10-43-77,
11-7-73, 13-13-4, and 23A-27-25; and
(b) Divide the result of (a) by the September 2015 fall enrollment, excluding
any adjustments based on prior year student counts;
(12) "Alternative local need," may only be used by a school district created or
reorganized before July 1, 2016, and is the alternative per student need multiplied
by the fall enrollment, excluding any adjustments based on prior year student
counts;
(13) "Local effort," the amount of ad valorem taxes generated in a school fiscal year by
applying the levies established pursuant to § 10-12-42. Beginning on July 1, 2017,
local effort includes the amount of funds apportioned to each school district in the
year preceding the most recently completed school fiscal year pursuant to §§ 10-
33-24, 10-35-21 as provided by subdivision (15), 10-36-10, 10-43-77, 11-7-73,
13-13-4, and 23A-27-25 and that exceeds the other revenue base amount;
(14)(10) "Other revenue base amount," is zero;
(15)(11) "Wind energy tax revenue," any wind energy tax revenue apportioned to school
districts pursuant to § 10-35-21 from a wind farm producing power for the first
time before July 1, 2016, is considered local effort pursuant to subdivision (13) and
other revenue base amount pursuant to subdivision (14). However, for wind energy
tax revenue apportioned to a school district from a wind farm producing power for
the first time after June 30, 2016, one hundred percent must be retained by the
school district to which the tax revenue is apportioned for the first five years of
producing power, eighty percent for the sixth year, sixty percent for the seventh
year, forty percent for the eighth year, twenty percent for the ninth year, and zero
percent thereafter. If a wind farm begins producing power for the first time
between October first and December thirty-first in a calendar year, any revenues
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 5 1239
generated for that time period must be retained by the school district and that time
period may not be counted against the first five-year period;
(16)(12) "Per student equivalent," for funding calculations that are determined on a per
student basis, the per student equivalent is calculated as follows:
(a) Multiply the target teacher compensation times the sum of one plus the
overhead rate; and
(b) Divide subsection (a) by 15;
(17)(13) "Monthly cash balance," the total amount of money for each month in the
school district's general fund, calculated by adding all deposits made during the
month to the beginning cash balance and deducting all disbursements or payments
made during the month;
(18)(14) "General fund base percentage," is determined as follows:
(a) Forty percent for a school district with a fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) of two hundred or less;
(b) Thirty percent for a school district with fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) of more than two hundred but less than six hundred; and
(c) Twenty-five percent for a school district with fall enrollment as defined in
subdivision (2) greater than or equal to six hundred.
When determining the general fund base percentage, the secretary of the
Department of Education shall use the lesser of the school district's fall enrollment
as defined in subdivision (2) for the current school year or the school district's fall
enrollment from the previous two years;
(19)(15) "Allowable general fund cash balance," the general fund base percentage
multiplied by the district's general fund expenditures in the previous school year;
and
(20)(16) "Alternative instruction participation adjustment," is calculated by multiplying
0.10 times the number of children who participated in the prior school year in high
school interscholastic activities sanctioned or sponsored by the South Dakota High
School Activities Association, as permitted by § 13-36-7, while receiving
alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3, multiplied by the per student
equivalent defined in this section.
Section 4. That § 13-13-73 be AMENDED:
13-13-73. No later than July 1, 2016, a school district shall notify the secretary
of education in writing as to whether the school district's state aid is to be calculated using
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 6 1239
the alternative local need calculation. If a school district chooses the alternative local
need calculation, the school district shall notify the secretary in writing no later than July
first of each subsequent fiscal year as to whether to continue to use the alternative local
need calculation for that fiscal year. If a school district chooses not to use the alternative
local need calculation, the school district may not use that calculation in any subsequent
school year. The secretary of the Department of Education shall compute state aid to
education for each school district according to the following calculations:
(1) For school districts not utilizing the alternative local need calculation, state aid is
local need as defined in § 13-13-10.1 minus local effort, or zero if the calculation
is a negative number;
(2) For school districts utilizing the alternative local need calculation, state aid is the
alternative local need as defined in subdivision 13-13-10.1(12) minus local effort,
or zero if the calculation is a negative number;
(3)
If the state aid appropriation for the general support of education is in excess of
the entitlement provided for in this section and the entitlement provided for in § 13-13-
85, the excess shall be used to fund any shortfall of the appropriation as provided for in
§ 13-37-36.3. The secretary shall report to the Governor by January seventh of each year,
the amount of state aid necessary to fully fund the general aid formula in the current year.
If a shortfall in the state aid appropriation for general education exists that cannot be
covered by § 13-37-45, the Governor shall must inform the Legislature and provide a
proposal to eliminate the shortfall.
If the state aid appropriation for the general support of education is in excess of
the entitlement provided for in this section and the entitlement provided for in § 13-13-
85, the excess must be used to fund any shortfall of the appropriation as provided for in
§ 13-37-36.3.
Section 5. That § 13-13-71 be REPEALED.
If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage
than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the
following year each of the levies specified in subdivision 13-13-10.1(13) shall be reduced
proportionally so that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate
basis equals the percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 6. That § 13-13-72 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 7 1239
It is the policy of the Legislature that the appropriation for state aid to education
increase on an annual basis by the percentage increase in local need on an aggregate
statewide basis so that the relative proportion of local need paid by local effort and state
aid shall remain constant. For school fiscal years 2017 to 2022, inclusive, the proportion
of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be adjusted annually to maintain the
proportion between state aid and local property taxes and to reflect adjustments in local
effort due to the implementation of the other revenue base amount as defined in § 13-
13-10.1.
Section 7. That § 13-13-72.1 be REPEALED.
Any adjustments in the levies specified in § 10-12-42 made pursuant to §§ 13-13-
71 and 13-13-72 shall be based on maintaining the relationship between statewide local
effort as a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year
in which the adjustment is made. For school fiscal years 2017 to 2022, inclusive, the
proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be adjusted annually to
reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the other revenue base
amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1. However, if the levies specified in § 10-12-42 are not
adjusted to maintain this relationship, the target teacher salary as defined in § 13-13-
10.1 shall be reduced to maintain the relationship between statewide local effort as a
percentage of statewide local need.
Section 8. That § 13-13-81 be REPEALED.
Terms used in this section and §§ 13-13-82 and 13-13-83 mean:
(1) "Eligible school district," a school district that does not receive state aid to
education distributed pursuant to chapter 13-13 and that operates a high school
primarily focused on career and technical education;
(2) "Eligible student," a student who currently attends a high school primarily focused
on career and technical education that is operated by an eligible school district and
who, immediately prior to attending the high school primarily focused on career
and technical education, was enrolled in a South Dakota school district other than
the eligible school district.
Section 9. That § 13-13-82 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.244.9 8 1239
An eligible school district shall receive an amount equal to the per student
equivalent as defined in § 13-13-10.1 multiplied by the number of eligible students
included in its fall enrollment as defined in § 13-13-10.1.
Section 10. That § 13-13-83 be REPEALED.
The amount calculated in § 13-13-82 and in § 13-13-87 shall be distributed to an
eligible school district in the same manner as other state aid payments are distributed
pursuant to § 13-13-74 from funds appropriated in the general appropriations act for state
aid to education.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.